Illinois, session 104th, SB2256.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5adding Section 5-4.5-120 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-120 new)7    Sec. 5-4.5-120. SENTENCING REVIEW OF INCARCERATED 8INDIVIDUALS. Any person imprisoned in the penitentiary may, 9after serving 10 years or more of his or her sentence or 10cumulative sentences, submit a petition for sentencing review 11in the circuit court of the county in which he or she was 12originally sentenced. The procedure for sentencing review 13shall occur in the following manner:14    (1) The chief judge of the criminal division of the 15circuit located in a county of 2,000,000 or more inhabitants, 16or in counties under 2,000,000 inhabitants, the chief judge of 17the circuit or a judge assigned by the chief judge, in which 18the petition is filed, shall assign the matter to any judge.19    (2) Upon receipt of the petition and assignment to a 20judge, the judge shall determine within 30 days if the 21petitioner has sought filing in the appropriate court and has 22served 10 or more years of his or her sentence. If the court 23determines that either of those factors are not satisfied, it   SB2256- 2 -LRB104 09299 RLC 22299 b1shall dismiss the petition and notify the petitioner of the 2reason for the dismissal. This notification shall be served 3upon the petitioner by certified mail within 10 days of its 4entry. If the court determines the petition was appropriately 5filed, it shall docket the petition. If the petitioner is 6without counsel and alleges in the petition for sentencing 7review that he or she is without means to procure counsel, he 8or she shall state whether he or she wishes counsel to be 9appointed to represent him or her. If appointment of counsel 10is requested, the court shall appoint the Public Defender if 11the court is satisfied that the petitioner has no means to 12procure counsel. The clerk of the circuit court shall serve a 13copy of the petition to the State's Attorney of that county or 14his or her representative.15    (3) Upon receipt of the petition for sentencing review, 16the State's Attorney's Office shall provide notice to the 17victim or his or her family, or both, and notice to the victim 18or his or her family, or both, of any restorative justice 19programs or any other resources available in the State or the 20local area. The State's Attorney may also include, but is not 21limited to, providing a copy of the petition by certified mail 22and connection to a victim advocate. The State's Attorney 23shall make every effort to provide such notice and, if 24unsuccessful, shall notify the chief judge of the circuit 25court and the judge assigned to the sentencing review.26    (4) The petitioner, if pro se, or his or her attorney may   SB2256- 3 -LRB104 09299 RLC 22299 b1amend the petition for sentencing review.2    (5) The State's Attorney must be afforded an opportunity 3to respond to the petition and the court shall provide the 4petitioner with the opportunity to reply.5    (6) Within 90 days after the filing of the petition for 6sentencing review, the court shall set the matter for a 7hearing. This date may be extended by motion of either party 8and at the court's discretion for good cause shown.9    (7) At the sentencing review hearing, the court shall:10        (A) consider in mitigation the factors listed in 11    subparagraphs (A) through (L) of paragraph (8) of this 12    Section;13        (B) consider the evidence, if any, received at trial;14        (C) consider any presentence reports;15        (D) consider the financial impact of incarceration 16    based on the financial impact statement filed with the 17    clerk of the court by the Department of Corrections;18        (E) consider any additional evidence and information 19    offered by the parties in aggravation and mitigation, 20    including, but not limited to, scientific evidence of 21    recidivism;22        (F) consider the person's overall record of behavior 23    while incarcerated, including disciplinary history, 24    participation in educational and vocational programs 25    available to the petitioner, including, but not limited 26    to, restorative justice programs and extent of cooperation   SB2256- 4 -LRB104 09299 RLC 22299 b1    with staff;2        (G) hear arguments as to sentencing alternatives;3        (H) afford the petitioner the opportunity to make a 4    statement on his or her own behalf without being subject 5    to cross-examination; and6        (I) afford the victim or family of the victim of the 7    crime, or both, for which the petitioner was originally 8    sentenced an opportunity to provide a victim impact 9    statement to the court. The court shall permit those 10    statements and consider the live testimony of a victim or 11    a victim representative.12    (8) Following the hearing, the court may affirm or reduce 13the petitioner's sentence and shall be authorized to depart 14downward from any mandatory minimum or mandatory sentence 15enhancement, taking into consideration the following factors:16        (A) the petitioner's current age, as well as the 17    petitioner's age, impetuosity, and level of maturity at 18    the time of the offense, including the ability to consider 19    risks and consequences of behavior, and the presence of 20    cognitive or developmental disability, if any;21        (B) whether the petitioner was subjected to outside 22    pressure, including peer pressure, familial pressure, or 23    negative influences;24        (C) the petitioner's family and community 25    circumstances, home environment, educational and social 26    background, including any history of parental neglect,   SB2256- 5 -LRB104 09299 RLC 22299 b1    physical, mental, or sexual abuse, involvement in the 2    child welfare system, or other childhood trauma including 3    adverse childhood experiences (or ACEs);4        (D) the nature and circumstances of the offense;5        (E) the petitioner's degree of participation and 6    specific role in the offense, including the level of 7    planning by the defendant before the offense;8        (F) whether the person was able to meaningfully 9    participate in his or her defense;10        (G) the petitioner's prior juvenile or criminal 11    history;12        (H) the history and characteristics of the petitioner 13    at the time of the petition, including rehabilitation and 14    maturity demonstrated by the petitioner;15        (I) the involvement of the petitioner in the 16    community, either prior to or during the period of 17    incarceration; 18        (J) any report from a physical, mental, or psychiatric 19    examination of the petitioner conducted by a licensed 20    health professional;21        (K) any changes to the law governing criminal 22    convictions, dispositions, or length of stay since the 23    time of sentencing; and24        (L) any other information the court finds relevant and 25    reliable, including an expression of remorse, if 26    appropriate. However, if the person, on advice of counsel   SB2256- 6 -LRB104 09299 RLC 22299 b1    chooses not to make a statement, the court shall not 2    consider a lack of an expression of remorse as an 3    aggravating factor.4    The order following a sentencing review hearing is a final 5judgment. Any final judgment entered upon the petition shall 6be reviewed in a manner pursuant to the rules of the Supreme 7Court.8    (9) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the 9contrary, any offender who has petitioned the circuit court 10for sentencing review pursuant to this Section shall not be 11eligible to submit a second petition until at least 5 years 12have elapsed since the date on which the circuit court ruled 13upon the initial petition. In considering the second petition, 14the court shall follow the procedure stated in paragraphs (2) 15through (8) of this Section. Following a hearing on the second 16petition pursuant to this paragraph (9), the court may affirm 17or reduce such petitioner's sentence. The order following a 18hearing pursuant to this paragraph is a final judgment.19    (10) The petitioner may file a motion seeking leave for 20sentencing review when 5 years have elapsed since the date on 21which the circuit court ruled on a petition filed pursuant to 22paragraph (9) of this Section. The motion must clearly set 23forth the need for sentencing review, including the efforts 24the petitioner has made towards rehabilitation and his or her 25demonstrated maturity.26        (A) Within 90 days after the filing of this motion,   SB2256- 7 -LRB104 09299 RLC 22299 b1    the court shall examine the motion and enter an order on 2    the motion. In considering a motion under this paragraph, 3    the court may examine the court file of the proceeding in 4    which the petitioner was convicted, any action taken by an 5    appellate court in that proceeding, any transcripts of 6    that proceeding, and any transcript or court documents 7    from previous proceedings under this Section. If the court 8    determines the motion is frivolous or is patently without 9    merit, it shall deny the motion in a written order, 10    specifying the underlying basis for its decision that 11    continued incarceration is appropriate and necessary. The 12    order is a final judgment and shall be served upon the 13    petitioner by certified mail within 10 days of its entry.14        (B) If the petition is not dismissed under 15    subparagraph (A), the court shall order the motion for 16    sentencing review to be docketed for further consideration 17    in accordance with the procedure stated in paragraphs (2) 18    through (8) of this Section.19    (11) This Section shall operate retroactively to provide 20any person incarcerated for a crime or crimes committed, 21before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 22General Assembly, with the opportunity to file a motion for 23resentencing under this Section under the terms provided in 24this Section.25    (12) Notwithstanding anything else to the contrary in this 26Section, nothing in this Section shall be construed to delay   SB2256- 8 -LRB104 09299 RLC 22299 b1parole or mandatory supervised release consideration for 2petitioners who, prior to the effective date of this 3amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, are or will be 4eligible for release earlier than this Section provides.5    (13) The clerk of the court shall serve copies of the 6petitions, any amendments to the petition and the final orders 7to the Illinois Sentencing Policy Advisory Council. The 8Illinois Sentencing Policy Advisory Council shall report on 9the impact of resentencing motions on the prison population 10contingent on having sufficient reliable data to support the 11analysis. The report shall be due 3 years after the effective 12date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.